Louisiana, session 2026, SB37.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 40:1285.1 through 1285.4, 1285.6(B), and 1285.7 are hereby
amended and reenacted to read as follows:
PART II. LEAD POISONING PREVENTION AND CONTROL PROGRAM
§1285.1. Establishment of lead poisoning prevention program Lead Poisoning
Prevention and Control Program
A. The Louisiana Department of Health shall establish a program for the
prevention, screening, diagnosis, and treatment of lead poisoning in its the Lead
Page 1 of 10
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-7 ENGROSSED
SB NO. 37
Poisoning Prevention and Control Program within the office of public health.
B. This program shall, to the extent permitted by appropriations, The
program shall provide for the prevention of lead poisoning through all of the
following:
(1) Requiring submission of lead testing results for early learning centers
and schools with prekindergarten programs that were built prior to 1978 in
order to obtain any required department approval of plans and specifications.
(2) Managing mandatory reporting of lead poisoning cases.
(3) Developing, implementing, and enforcing protocols for detection of
lead poisoning sources.
(4) Developing and conducting public and professional education;.
(5) shall ensure Ensuring the availability of screening, diagnosis, and
treatment relative to lead poisoning of children under the age of six years and
persons deemed at risk by the state health officer;.
(6) and shall advocate for the abatement of Advocating for lead hazard
control methods concerning sources of lead when appropriate. The program shall
not apply to those persons having religious objections to the examination.
C. The state health officer or his designee may contract with a public
agency or a university or collaborate with any agencies, individuals, or groups
for the provision of necessary services, the development of educational
programs, scientific research, and detection and abatement of sources of lead
poisoning required pursuant to this Part.
D. As used in this Part, unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the
following terms shall have the following meanings:
(1) "Facility" or "facilities" means a building including but not limited
to those buildings operating as an early learning center or a school with a
prekindergarten program.
(2) "Lead hazard" shall have the meaning set forth in R.S. 30:2351.1.
(3) "Lead hazard control methods" means measures taken to reduce or
Page 2 of 10
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-7 ENGROSSED
SB NO. 37
eliminate a lead hazard, including but not limited to lead abatement, interim
controls, or both, as appropriate.
(4) "Schools with prekindergarten program" means and is limited to the
classroom space primarily occupied by children in the prekindergarten
program and shall not include communal spaces such as cafeterias, libraries,
gymnasiums, or places of worship.
E. In the event of a conflict between any provision of this Part and a
provision of R.S. 13:5233.1 or Title 17, the provision of this Part shall prevail.
F. The office of public health shall promulgate rules and regulations to
implement this program.
§1285.2. Collaboration with other organizations Lead testing requirements; early
learning centers; schools with prekindergarten programs
The state health officer or his designee may contract with a public agency or
a university or collaborate with any agencies, individuals, or groups for the provision
of necessary services, the development of educational programs, scientific research,
and detection and abatement of sources of lead poisoning, subject to appropriations,
and shall promulgate and from time to time amend such rules and regulations as may
be necessary.
A.(1) Every early learning center and school with a prekindergarten
program that was built, in whole or in part, prior to 1978 shall have a lead risk
assessment performed by a certified lead risk assessor and submit the results to
the department as a requirement for obtaining any departmental approval of
plans and specifications.
(2) The lead risk assessment shall include lead testing results which shall
include testing of all painted surfaces of the building, dust, water, and soil
adjacent to the building and on any property that is regularly utilized by the
children enrolled at the early learning center or prekindergarten program.
B.(1) If test results identify lead hazards, the department shall not grant
approval of plans and specifications for a new early learning center or new
Page 3 of 10
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-7 ENGROSSED
SB NO. 37
school with a prekindergarten program until appropriate lead hazard control
methods have been verified by a clearance inspection authorized by the state
health officer.
(2) If test results identify lead hazards the early learning center or school
with a prekindergarten program shall enter into a lead hazard abatement
agreement with the department which shall include required compliance with
certain timelines and efforts to mitigate danger to children on the premises as
required by the state health officer.
C. If the owner or operator of an early learning center or school with a
prekindergarten program provides test results to the department which show
no lead hazards in the building, water supply, or soil, the documentation shall
be sufficient for one-time submission and shall be noted in the files held by the
department. No further lead hazard testing shall be required unless the owner
or operator initiates major alterations through renovation or remodeling that
warrants subsequent approval by the department.
D. The department shall provide an owner or operator with a list
developed by the Department of Environmental Quality of persons approved
or licensed to conduct the non-drinking water lead testing required by this Part.
§1285.3. Mandatory reporting of lead poisoning cases required; comprehensive
records
A. Any local health officer, health unit supervisor, examining physician,
hospital, public health nurse, or reporting person The state health officer shall
define test results which are positive for the presence of lead. Healthcare
providers shall report to the state health officer or his designee the existence and
circumstances of each case of lead poisoning known to him and not previously
reported. Such reports all test results for lead hazards. Reports shall be made on
forms prescribed by the state health officer or his designee. The state health officer
shall by regulation, and in accordance with current technical knowledge and
guidelines of the United States Centers for Disease Control and Prevention, United
Page 4 of 10
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-7 ENGROSSED
SB NO. 37
States Environmental Protection Agency, and United States Department of Housing
and Urban Development, define the terms "lead poisoning" and "previously
reported" and what constitutes hazardous lead conditions in the environment.
B. When the state health officer or his designee is informed of a case of lead
poisoning pursuant to Subsection A of this Section or otherwise, he shall strongly
encourage recommend the examination of all other children under the age of six
years, and all any other persons person deemed at risk by the state health officer or
his designee, who is residing or recently residing resided in the household of the
person with lead poisoning. The results of such the examinations shall be reported
to the persons or agency reporting the original case pursuant to Subsection A of this
Section, and to such other persons or agencies as the state health officer or his
designee deems advisable.
§1285.4. Program for detection Detection of lead poisoning sources; voluntary and
compulsory inspections; posting dangerous areas; mandatory physical
examinations
A.(1) The state health officer or his designee shall establish a comprehensive
program protocols for detection of sources of lead poisoning. Such program shall
attempt, to the extent permitted by appropriations, to locate To the extent
practicable, the protocols shall identify all dwellings, early learning centers, and
schools with prekindergarten programs in which the paint, plaster, or other
accessible substance contains dangerous amounts of lead hazards. The means of
detection and the amount of lead that produces the danger of lead poisoning shall be
determined by regulation by the state health officer in accordance with current
technical knowledge and guidelines of the United States Centers for Disease Control
and Prevention, United States Environmental Protection Agency, and United States
Department of Housing and Urban Development.
(2) Such programs of detection Lead detection shall, to the extent that all
appropriate dwellings are not inspected, give priority in inspections to be prioritized
in those dwellings located in areas where significant numbers of lead poisoning cases
Page 5 of 10
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-7 ENGROSSED
SB NO. 37
have recently been reported, and in which children under the age of six years or other
persons deemed at risk by the state health officer or his designee reside. and which
serve as the primary residence for a child under the age of six, a person deemed
at risk by the surgeon general, or are operating as an early learning center or
school with a prekindergarten program.
B. When the state health officer or his designee is informed of a case of child
lead poisoning pursuant to this Part, or otherwise, he shall cause to have inspected
the he shall order an investigation of any dwelling in which the person child with
lead poisoning resides, or has recently resided, if the occupants of said the dwelling
consent, after reasonable notice, to such inspection the investigation. The state
health officer or his designee may also order an investigation of any other
properties or premises in which the child spends a significant amount of time.
The findings of such inspection the investigations shall be reported to the state
health officer or his designee and to the appropriate enforcement authorities provided
in R.S. 40:1285.9.
C. A dangerous level of lead Lead hazards found in a dwelling, early
learning center, or school with a prekindergarten program inspected
investigated pursuant to this Section, or otherwise, shall be reported immediately to
the owner of the building, early learning center, or school with a prekindergarten
program or to his duly appointed representative, all affected tenants or occupants,
the appropriate enforcement authorities set out in R.S. 40:1285.9, and the state health
officer or his designee. The state health officer or his designee shall inform such
other persons or agencies as he deems advisable, and shall cause to have prominently
posted post on the main entrance to said the dwelling or facility a notice that the
dwelling or facility contains dangerous amounts of lead paint or other lead materials
lead hazards and that children under the age of six years and persons deemed at risk
should not be allowed to reside in said or occupy the dwelling or facility. Such The
notice may not be removed until all premises have been found to comply with R.S.
40:1285.7. Unauthorized intentional removal of the notice shall subject the offender
Page 6 of 10
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-7 ENGROSSED
SB NO. 37
to a fine of five hundred dollars.
D. When a dangerous level of lead hazard is found in a dwelling, early
learning center, or school with a prekindergarten program inspected
investigated pursuant to this Part, or otherwise, the state health officer or his
designee shall cause to have examined order an examination of all children under
the age of six years and other persons as he may find advisable to examine, residing
in or occupying, or who have recently resided in or occupied said the dwelling,
early learning center, or school with a prekindergarten program. The results of
such the examinations shall be reported to the state health officer or his designee, the
affected individual, and his parent or legal guardian. The state health officer or his
designee shall inform such other persons or agencies as he deems advisable.
* * *
§1285.6. Sale and use of lead-based paint and other similar lead-based surface
coating material restricted; penalties
* * *
B.(1) No person shall knowingly sell or offer for sale any other lead-based
paint or similar surface coating material that may be purchased by the general public
unless the container is clearly labeled as to its intended use and bears on the principal
display panel the word "WARNING" and the following statement: "Contains lead.
Dried film of this paint may be harmful if eaten or chewed."
(2) The following cautionary statement, or its practical equivalent, shall be
placed on the label but need not be part of the warning statement on the principal
display panel:
"Do not apply on toys and other children's articles, furniture, or interior
surfaces of any dwelling. Do not apply on those exterior surfaces of any dwelling,
such as window sills, porches, stairs, or railings, to which children may be
commonly exposed. Keep Out Of The Reach of Children."
(3) The type size of this labeling shall be in accordance with the requirements
for precautionary labeling under the Federal Hazardous Substances Act, 15 U.S.C.
Page 7 of 10
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-7 ENGROSSED
SB NO. 37
§1260 (1970).
* * *
§1285.7. Safety precautions; procedures for removal and repainting
A. Whenever a child or children under six years of age or person with an
intellectual disability resides in any residential premises in which any paint, plaster,
or other accessible materials contain dangerous levels of lead hazards as defined
pursuant to the provisions of this Part, after notification by the state health officer or
his representative, the owner shall remove or cover said the paint, plaster, or other
material so as to make it inaccessible to children under six years of age or persons
with intellectual disabilities. Whenever any such residential premises containing said
dangerous levels of lead hazards undergoes a change of ownership and as a result
thereof, a child under six years of age or a person with an intellectual disability will
become a resident therein, the new owner shall remove or cover said the paint,
plaster, or other material so as to make it inaccessible to such the child or person.
B. Repainting with nonlead based paint, without removal of the offending
lead paint, plaster, or other material shall not constitute compliance with this
Section. Such All removal or covering shall be performed as follows:
(1) All peeling paint, plaster or other material, on both interior and exterior
surfaces and fixtures, shall be removed or adequately covered.
(2) Paint, plaster, or other material that is not peeling shall be removed or
covered on window sills; door frames; windows, including mullions; stair rail
spindles; stair treads; doors; stair rails; porch railings, and all other exterior and
interior surfaces or fixtures that may be readily chewed by children or persons with
intellectual disabilities.
C. This duty The requirements of this Section shall apply to every owner
of residential premises whenever wherever a child under six years of age or a person
with an intellectual disability resides therein or whenever such the premises
undergoes a change of ownership and as a result thereof a child under six years of
age or person with an intellectual disability shall reside therein resides, whether or
Page 8 of 10
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-7 ENGROSSED
SB NO. 37
not his premises have been inspected pursuant to R.S. 40:1285.4 or otherwise. The
provisions of this Section shall be strictly construed and enforced so as to best
protect the safety of residents of such the dwellings.
D. Every owner of residential premises who violates the provisions of this
Section shall commence correction of the condition constituting the violation within
fifteen days after notification of the violation, which project shall be completed and
complete the correction within thirty days of commencement.
Section 2. R.S. 30:2351.1(7), 2351.52(A) and (C), and 2351.53 and R.S.
40:1285.6(G) are hereby repealed.